Louisiana, session 2026, HB454.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 25:960 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§960. The Gracey Claire Rushing Act
A. This Section shall be known and may be cited as the "Gracey Claire
Rushing Act", in memory of a young child whose passing in 2009 highlighted the
need for improved safeguards in the treatment of decedents' remains.
B. The purpose of this Section is to establish a mandatory chain of custody
protocol for the handling, examination, and return of human remains and internal
organs during autopsies and forensic investigations in this state. This protocol
ensures transparency, accountability, and respect for the deceased and their families
by requiring detailed documentation and inventory of major organs to prevent
discrepancies, unauthorized retention, or mishandling.
C. For the purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-907 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 454
(1) "Autopsy" means a post-mortem external and internal physical
examination conducted in accordance with accepted medical practice performed by
a forensic pathologist or, if a forensic pathologist is unavailable, a pathologist
licensed or otherwise appointed to conduct an examination.
(2) "Chain-of-custody report" means a signed and dated document detailing
the transfer, condition, and inventory of the decedent's remains and organs at each
stage of handling.
(3) "Coroner" means the parish coroner or his authorized representative as
provided for in R.S. 13:5701 et seq.
(4) "Decedent" means a deceased human being.
(5) "Forensic pathologist" means a licensed physician certified by the
American Board of Pathology.
(6) "Funeral home" means a licensed funeral establishment as defined in R.S.
37:831.
(7) "Major organs" include but are not limited to the heart, lungs, brain,
kidneys, liver, stomach, and bladder.
(8) "Viscera bag" means a heavy duty, leak resistant bag used during post-
autopsy care to contain and store a decedent's internal organs before the organs are
returned to the body cavity.
D. The following chain of custody protocol is mandatory for all autopsies
performed in this state where internal organs are removed or examined:
(1)(a) Upon receiving the decedent, the coroner shall perform a preliminary
examination and document the condition of the body, including a comprehensive log
of its receipt.
(b) The comprehensive log shall include all of the following:
(i) The date and time of receipt.
(ii) A detailed description of the state of the remains.
(iii) Any observations regarding visible injuries, condition, or anomalies.
(iv) Photographic documentation where appropriate.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-907 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 454
(2)(a) The body shall be transferred to the forensic pathologist with a
chain-of-custody report.
(b) The pathologist shall perform the autopsy and document all procedures,
including:
(i) Any biopsies or samples taken.
(ii) A detailed list of all major organs removed during the procedure.
(iii) Placement of organs intended for return in a viscera bag along with
documentation of the contents.
(iv) For any organ retained for further analysis, documentation in the autopsy
report, including justification, expected duration of retention, and notification
procedures to the next of kin.
(3)(a) Upon completion of the autopsy, the pathologist shall return the body
to the funeral home or designated recipient. The viscera bag containing all retained
organs, excluding those lawfully retained for further testing, shall be placed within
the abdominal cavity.
(b) A signed and dated chain-of-custody report shall accompany the transfer,
including both of the following:
(i) Verification that all non-retained major organs are accounted for and
returned.
(ii) An inventory list of major organs that accompany the decedent detailing
their presence or lawful retention.
(4) Upon receipt of the remains, the funeral home shall do all of the
following:
(a) Remove the viscera bag and conduct an independent inventory of its
contents.
(b) Verify the presence of all major organs as listed in the chain-of-custody
report.
(c) Report any discrepancies, missing organs, or anomalies to the forensic
pathologist and coroner for resolution.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-907 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 454
(d) Document the resolution in an updated chain-of-custody report, with
copies provided to the next of kin upon request.
E.(1) The coroner or forensic pathologist shall notify the decedent's next of
kin or legal representative in writing within forty-eight hours of any organ retention,
including the reason, expected timeline for return, and contact information for
inquiries.
(2) Upon request, the next of kin shall receive a copy of the full
chain-of-custody report and autopsy findings, subject to any legal restrictions on
sensitive information.
F.(1) The coroner's office shall maintain all chain-of-custody reports and
inventories as public records for a minimum of ten years.
(2) Failure to comply with this protocol may result in disciplinary action,
including fines up to five thousand dollars per violation, suspension of licensure, or
referral to the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners or other relevant
authorities.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Health shall promulgate rules and
regulations to implement this Section in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, including standardized forms for chain-of-custody reports and organ
inventories.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.